Maine, session 132, LD1848.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 37-B MRSA §1113, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 460, §3, is repealed and the
following enacted in its place:
§1113. Duties of department
In accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted pursuant to this
chapter, the department shall inspect existing dams and reservoirs to determine their hazard
potential, review the design and construction of new and reconstructed dams, assist dam
owners in developing emergency action plans to minimize the effects of dam failure and
take all necessary actions in emergency situations of probable dam failure to protect life
and property.
1. Authority of other persons. Except for the Federal Government, a person may not
exercise any authority over the emergency regulation or supervision of any dams or
reservoirs in the State when that exercise would conflict with the powers and authority of
the department under this chapter.
2. Coordination with Department of Environmental Protection. In administering
and enforcing the provisions of this chapter, the department shall, as necessary, coordinate
and establish any written policies or agreements with the Department of Environmental
Protection with respect to the authority of the Department of Environmental Protection
under Title 38, chapter 5 to ensure the efficient administration and enforcement of this
chapter and of Title 38, chapter 5.
3. Comprehensive database management system. The department shall develop
and implement a comprehensive database management system for use in its administration
and enforcement of this chapter. The department shall ensure that all public records in its
possession relating to the administration and enforcement of this chapter are digitized and
integrated into and accessible from the database management system implemented under
this subsection.
4. Written policies and procedures. The department shall establish by rule
comprehensive written policies and procedures necessary for its administration and
enforcement of this chapter, including, but not limited to, policies and procedures for:
A. Compliance with and enforcement of this chapter that encourage voluntary
compliance over enforcement action;
B. Dam evaluations, dam inspections and dam inspection follow-ups for use by
department staff, dam owners and other persons; and
C. Dam security measures and dam-related public safety measures, including, but not
limited to, requirements for implementation by dam owners of surveillance and
monitoring measures at dam sites.
In developing the policies and procedures required by this subsection, the department shall
as necessary consult with relevant state agencies and other entities, including, but not
limited to, the Department of Environmental Protection. Rules adopted by the department
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Page 1 - 132LR2004(01)

5. Staffing; training. The department shall hire, employ or contract with persons
necessary for the administration and enforcement of this chapter, including, but not limited
to, one or more state dam inspectors pursuant to section 1117. The department shall
provide for the necessary training of department staff under this chapter, including, but not
limited to, ongoing staff training and professional development opportunities.
6. Stakeholder engagement. The department shall develop and implement a plan for
conducting outreach to and maintaining regular communication with persons with an
interest in the administration of this chapter, including, but not limited to, dam owners.
7. Annual report. On or before January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the
department shall submit a report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over emergency management matters regarding the administration and
enforcement of this chapter. The report must include, but is not limited to, information
regarding any staffing and operational needs for the dam safety program under this chapter;
current and anticipated funding levels for the program; information regarding the
development and implementation of guidelines, policies and procedures under the program;
and information regarding dam inspections conducted and enforcement actions taken under
the program. After reviewing the report, the committee may report out related legislation.
Sec. 2. 37-B MRSA §1117, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 460, §3, is amended to read:
§1117. Inspectors of dams
The commissioner shall appoint or hire one or more state dam inspectors who are
licensed as professional engineers under Title 32, chapter 19 and who are experienced in
the inspection and design of dams. For the purposes of this chapter, a state dam inspector
appointed or hired by the commissioner pursuant to this section is the legal representative
of the commissioner.
Sec. 3. 37-B MRSA §1118, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Evaluation of downstream hazard. The commissioner shall evaluate the
downstream hazard potential of each dam to determine the potential risk to public safety
and property downstream from the dam that may result from the failure or operation of the
dam. For each dam assigned a high hazard potential or significant hazard potential, the
evaluation under this subsection must be completed at least once every 5 years.
Sec. 4. 37-B MRSA §1118, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Potential failure mode analysis. The department shall adopt by rule policies and
guidelines for owners of dams assigned a high hazard potential pursuant to this section to
conduct potential failure mode analyses of dams, based on the potential failure mode
process developed by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission. Rules adopted by the
department pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 5. 37-B MRSA §1119, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2013, c. 146, §20, is further
amended to read:
1. Inspections. A state dam inspector shall conduct an inspection of all high and
significant hazard potential dams to determine whether the integrity, structural stability,
function or operation of those dams constitutes a threat to public safety, in accordance with
the following schedule:
Page 2 - 132LR2004(01)

A. All significant hazard potential dams, at least once every 6 5 years;
B. All high hazard potential dams, at least once every 6 5 years;
C. Any dam, within 60 days of a request for an inspection from the dam owner or the
municipality in which the dam is located or as soon as is practicable as weather and
other conditions allow; and
D. At any time any dam that may, in the judgment of the commissioner, constitute a
potential risk to public safety.
Notwithstanding the schedule outlined in this subsection, a state dam inspector shall
conduct an inspection of a significant or high hazard potential dam within 30 days of receipt
by the commissioner of a notice of transfer of ownership of the dam as required under
section 1128 unless the dam has been inspected under this subsection within 4 years
preceding the notice of transfer of ownership.
Sec. 6. 37-B MRSA §1119, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 460, §3, is amended
by enacting at the end a new blocked paragraph to read:
The commissioner may adopt rules establishing a schedule for the required payment of
monetary penalties by a dam owner, lessee or other person in control of a dam that fails to
implement remedial measures directed in a dam safety order issued by the commissioner
pursuant to this subsection. Rules adopted by the commissioner pursuant to this subsection
are major substantive rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 7. 37-B MRSA §1119-A is enacted to read:
§1119-A. Comprehensive dam review and inspection
The department shall establish by rule requirements and procedures for periodic
comprehensive review and inspection of dams assigned a high hazard potential pursuant to
section 1118 to be conducted by and at the expense of the owner of the dam at least once
every 12 years.
Rules adopted by the department pursuant to this section are routine technical rules as
defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 8. 37-B MRSA §1126, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 460, §3, is amended by
amending the section headnote to read:
§1126. Access and notification; engineering reports
Sec. 9. 37-B MRSA §1126, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Engineering reports. An owner, lessee or person in control of a dam shall provide
to the department a copy of any engineering study, inspection, comprehensive review or
report regarding the dam that was commissioned or otherwise facilitated by the owner,
lessee or person.
Sec. 10. 37-B MRSA §1127, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 460, §3, is repealed and the
following enacted in its place:
§1127. Emergency action plans
This section governs the preparation and review of emergency action plans.
Page 3 - 132LR2004(01)

1. Requirement for plan. The owner of a dam under the department's jurisdiction
shall prepare an emergency action plan for that dam, using a model emergency action plan
made available by the department, as follows:
A. Within 6 months of the classification of a dam as a high hazard potential dam or
significant hazard potential dam, the owner shall prepare an emergency action plan for
the dam and submit the plan to the department for review; and
B. Prior to the construction or reconstruction of any dam, the owner shall prepare an
emergency action plan for the dam and submit the plan to the department for review.
2. Submission of plan; availability. At the time the dam owner submits an emergency
action plan required by subsection 1, paragraph A, or an update to that plan, to the
department, the owner shall submit the plan to the appropriate local or county government
office where the dam is located. The department shall ensure that emergency action plans
submitted to the department pursuant to this section are made publicly available.
3. Update to plan. A dam owner that submits an emergency action plan required by
subsection 1, paragraph A shall update the plan as necessary and in accordance with
guidelines established by the department and submit the updated plan to the department for
review. The department shall establish guidelines for the updating of emergency action
plans under this subsection, which must require such updating at least every 2 years after
initial submission.
4. Testing. The department shall establish guidelines and procedures for the testing
of emergency action plans required by subsection 1, paragraph A.
Sec. 11. 38 MRSA §480-D, sub-§12 is enacted to read:
12. Construction or reconstruction of nonhydropower dam. If the proposed
activity involves the construction or reconstruction of a nonhydropower dam, prior to
granting a permit, the department shall notify the director of the Maine Emergency
Management Agency within the Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency
Management regarding the application. The director of the Maine Emergency
Management Agency shall provide the department with an assessment of the design and
construction or reconstruction of the proposed dam and any recommendations regarding
terms or conditions necessary to minimize the risk of dam failure and to protect public
safety and property downstream from the dam that may result from the failure or operation
of the dam.
As used in this subsection, "nonhydropower dam" has the same meaning as in section
480-Q, subsection 2-E.
Sec. 12. 38 MRSA §480-Q, sub-§2-E, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 124, §3, is
amended to read:
A. A long-term maintenance and repair plan for the dam has been submitted to the
department and to the Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management,
Maine Emergency Management Agency prior to the commencement of any
maintenance or repair activities;
Sec. 13. Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management;
state dam inspector. Pursuant to the authority under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title
37-B, section 1117, the Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management
Page 4 - 132LR2004(01)

414 shall take all necessary steps to ensure that, within 6 months of the effective date of this
425 Act, it has appointed or hired in a permanent capacity one or more state dam inspectors
436 meeting the requirements of section 1117. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
447 contrary, to attract qualified candidates for the state dam inspector position, the department
458 is authorized to offer a salary package for that position that is competitive and aligns with
469 pay standards for professional engineers in the State.
Sec. 14. Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management;
dam safety compliance. Consistent with the provisions of the Maine Revised Statutes,
Title 37-B, chapter 24, the Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management
shall as soon as practicable identify all dams in the State that are under its jurisdiction and
are not in compliance with applicable dam safety standards and, in accordance with the
compliance and enforcement policies and procedures adopted pursuant to Title 37-B,
section 1120, take all actions necessary to ensure that those dams achieve compliance,
prioritizing its actions based on the hazard potential of each identified dam as assigned
pursuant to Title 37-B, section 1118.
Sec. 15. Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management;
assessment of staffing and operational needs for dam safety program. The
Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management shall assess staffing and
operational needs for the administration and enforcement of the dam safety program under
the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 37-B, chapter 24.
By January 1, 2026, the department shall submit to the Joint Standing Committee on
Criminal Justice and Public Safety a report identifying the funding amounts necessary to
ensure the effective administration and enforcement of the dam safety program, which
must, at a minimum, identify the funding amounts necessary to support the hiring of one
additional state dam inspector position under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 37-B,
section 1117. After reviewing the report, the committee may report out related legislation
to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.